Georgia, session 2025_26, SB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 28 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding the General Assembly, is amended by adding a new Code section to
read as follows:
"28-1-17.
In redistricting the General Assembly and the congressional districts in Georgia, the
General Assembly shall follow the following procedures:
(1) There shall be a minimum of two public hearings in each judicial district of this state
during the redistricting process. There shall be one public hearing in each judicial district
of this state prior to the development of the redistricting plans. There shall be one public
S. B. 114
- 1 -

LC 47 3310
hearing in each judicial district of this state after the introduction of the proposed plan or
plans in the General Assembly which shall be held not later than one week prior to the
final vote on such proposed plan or plans;
(2) At least one public hearing shall be held in the municipality with the highest
population in each judicial district of this state, and at least one public hearing shall be
held in the municipality with the second highest population in each judicial district of this
state. Such hearings shall be open to the general public, and at least two members of the
General Assembly from each house of the General Assembly shall attend such public
hearings. One member from each house shall represent the majority party in such house,
and one member from each house shall represent the minority party in such house. Such
members shall come from the committee of each house that considers proposed
redistricting plans;
(3) The public hearings shall be recorded and made available both live as they occur and
as archived files for public viewing on the internet. During each public hearing, the
General Assembly members representing each house of the General Assembly shall
present the initial proposed plan or plans, explain the procedure or process used to create
such plan or plans, and hear public comments and suggestions. Public notice of such
public hearings shall be published on the public website of the General Assembly and
once a week for two consecutive weeks in the legal organ of each county, not later than
seven days prior to the date of the public hearing. Visual representations of the proposed
plan or plans shall be prominently displayed at each public hearing, and the plan or plans
shall be presented visually in sufficient detail so that the public may visually inspect all
district boundaries down to the residence level. The plan or plans shall be presented in
a manner that will allow any member of the public to immediately inspect the proposed
district in which such member lives as well as all neighboring districts;
(4) The proposed plan or plans shall be published on the public website of the General
Assembly not later than 48 hours after the proposed plan or plans have been assigned to
S. B. 114
- 2 -

LC 47 3310
committee. The plan or plans shall be presented visually in sufficient detail so that the
public may visually inspect all district boundaries down to the residence level, and the
plan or plans shall also include all data necessary for a third party to recreate an accurate
visual representation of such proposed plan or plans. The plan or plans shall be presented
in a manner that will allow any member of the public to immediately visually inspect the
proposed district in which such member lives as well as all neighboring districts. Any
initially proposed plan or plans published on the public website of the General Assembly
shall also include a detailed explanation of the procedure or process used to create such
plan or plans, including, but not limited to, all inputs, variables, factors, or other bases
used to create such plan or plans; draft maps; formulae or algorithms; and any hardware
or software relied upon to create such plan or plans. This paragraph shall be construed
to defeat any legal claim or defense that is brought or raised by any party to prevent the
disclosure of such procedure or process, including, but not limited to, a claim or defense
that such disclosure would constitute unlawful disclosure of a trade secret or other
confidential or proprietary information;
(5) All meetings, discussions, and deliberations concerning reapportionment upon the
assignment of a plan or plans to committee shall be conducted in public, and public notice
of such meetings, discussions, and deliberations shall be published on the public website
of the General Assembly at least seven days in advance;
(6) No committee vote shall be taken on a plan or plans unless such plan or plans have
been posted on the public website of the General Assembly and released at least two
weeks before such vote with the plan or plans presented visually in sufficient detail so
that the public may visually inspect all district boundaries down to the residence level,
and such plan or plans shall also include all data necessary for a third party to recreate an
accurate visual representation of such proposed plan or plans. Such plan or plans shall
be presented in a manner that will allow any member of the public to immediately
visually inspect the proposed district in which such member lives as well as all
S. B. 114
- 3 -

LC 47 3310
neighboring districts. Such plan or plans shall also include all relevant statistics
concerning such plan or plans;
(7) All communications sent to or from any government official or employee involved
in the reapportionment process, including electronic communications, shall be released
to the public for inspection and copying; and
(8) All communications with any party not hired or contracted to perform or not
responsible for performing the duties set forth in this Code section are strictly prohibited.
Such prohibition shall not apply to any public communications explicitly authorized by
this Code section. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as limiting any
obligations set forth in the law relating to disclosure of public records and open meetings
which shall apply to this Code section or any other applicable laws."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 114
- 4 -